Alaska statutes. Title 16. Fish and Game.
Article 5. Fish and Game Critical Habitat Areas.

Sec. 16.20.500.
Purpose.

The purpose of AS

16.20.500

—

16.20.690

is to protect and preserve habitat areas especially crucial to the perpetuation of fish and wildlife, and to restrict all other uses not compatible with that primary purpose.

History.

(§ 2 ch 140 SLA 1972)

Revisor’s notes. —

Formerly AS

16.20.220

.
Renumbered in 1987.

Administrative Code. —

For prohibited activities, see 5 AAC 95, art. 3.

For state critical habitat areas, see 5 AAC 95, art. 6.

Opinions of attorney general. —

The Office of the Attorney General interprets this section as requiring that any fee transfers of state lands in critical habitat areas to private, municipal, or federal ownership, be subject to covenants running with the land that make the land subject to the protections of AS

16.20.510

—

16.20.690

. 1985 Alas. Op. Att'y Gen. No. 4.

Sec. 16.20.510.
Regulations.

The Board of Fisheries and the Board of Game, where appropriate, shall adopt regulations they consider advisable for conservation and protection purposes governing the taking of fish and game in state fish and game critical habitat areas.

History.

(§ 2 ch 140 SLA 1972; am § 27 ch 206 SLA 1975)

Revisor’s notes. —

Formerly AS

16.20.240

.
Renumbered in 1987.

Sec. 16.20.520.
Multiple land use.

Before the use, lease, or other disposal of land under private ownership or state jurisdiction and control, within state fish and game critical habitat areas created under AS

16.20.500

—

16.20.690

, the person or responsible state department or agency shall notify the commissioner of fish and game.
The commissioner shall acknowledge receipt of notice by return mail.

History.

(§ 2 ch 140 SLA 1972)

Revisor’s notes. —

Formerly AS 16.20.250.
Renumbered in 1987.

Administrative Code. —

For prohibited activities, see 5 AAC 95, art. 3.

For special areas, see 5 AAC 95, art. 4.

For state critical habitat areas, see 5 AAC 95, art. 6.

For permit procedures, see 5 AAC 95, art. 7.

Opinions of attorney general. —

The language of AS

16.20.050

,

16.20.060

,

16.20.530

and this section precludes an interpretation which would grant Alaska Department of Fish and Game permit authority over transactions which are not likely to affect fish or game or their habitat. 1985 Alas. Op. Att'y Gen. No. 4.

Sec. 16.20.530.
Submission of plans and specifications.

When a board determines that the following information is required, it shall instruct the commissioner, in the letter of acknowledgment required under AS

16.20.520

, to require the person or governmental agency to submit:

full plans for the anticipated use;

full plans and specifications of proposed construction work;

complete plans and specifications for the proper protection of fish and game; and

the approximate date when the construction or work is to commence.

The board shall require the person or governmental agency to obtain the written approval of the commissioner as to the sufficiency of the plans or specifications before construction is commenced.

History.

(§ 2 ch 140 SLA 1972; am § 28 ch 206 SLA 1975)

Revisor’s notes. —

Formerly AS 16.20.260.
Renumbered in 1987. In 1992, the phrase “required under AS

16.20.520

” was added to the first sentence of this section to conform to the current style of the Alaska Statutes.

Administrative Code. —

For special areas, see 5 AAC 95, art. 4.

For state critical habitat areas, see 5 AAC 95, art. 6.

For permit procedures, see 5 AAC 95, art. 7.

Opinions of attorney general. —

The language of AS

16.20.050

,

16.20.060

,

16.20.520

and this section precludes an interpretation which would grant Alaska Department of Fish and Game permit authority over transactions which are not likely to affect fish or game or their habitat. 1985 Alas. Op. Att'y Gen. No. 4.

The most logical reading of
AS

16.20.060

and this section gives the Alaska Department of Fish and Game permit authority in special areas over any activity which the department determines may affect fish or game or their habitat; that interpretation is consistent with the language of the statutes and the general rule articulated by the Alaska Supreme Court, in

Kenai Peninsula Fisherman’s Coop. Ass’n v. State

, Sup. Ct. Op. No. 2358 (File No. 5072), 628 P.2d 897 (1981), that “conservation laws such as fish and game laws should be liberally construed to achieve their intended purpose.”
1985 Alas. Op. Att'y Gen. No. 4.

Sec. 16.20.550.
Port Moller Critical Habitat Area established.

The following described area is established as the Port Moller Critical Habitat Area:

Township 50 South, Range 71 West, Seward Meridian

Township 51 South, Range 71 West, Seward Meridian

Township 49 South, Range 73 West, Seward Meridian

Township 51 South, Range 72 West, Seward Meridian

Township 50 South, Range 72 West, Seward Meridian

Township 50 South, Range 73 West, Seward Meridian

Township 50 South, Range 74 West, Seward Meridian

Township 50 South, Range 75 West, Seward Meridian

Township 49 South, Range 75 West, Seward Meridian

Township 48 South, Range 75 West, Seward Meridian

Township 48 South, Range 76 West, Seward Meridian

Township 50 South, Range 76 West, Seward Meridian

Township 49 South, Range 76 West, Seward Meridian

Township 49 South, Range 77 West, Seward Meridian

Township 48 South, Range 77 West, Seward Meridian

Township 48 South, Range 78 West, Seward Meridian

Township 49 South, Range 78 West, Seward Meridian

Sections 7
—
8

Section 14 (not tide or submerged land)

Sections 15
—
17

Sections 21
—
23

Section 32;

Section 3 (not tide or submerged land)

Sections 4
—
5

Section 7

Sections 9
—
10

Sections 15
—
17;

Sections 10
—
11

Section 12 (not tide or submerged land)

Sections 13
—
16

Section 21

Section 24

Section 28;

Sections 5
—
8

Sections 11
—
12;

Sections 18
—
19

Sections 30
—
32;

Sections 7
—
13

Sections 14
—
17 (not tide or submerged land)

Section 18;

Sections 5 — 7

Section 8 (not tide or submerged land)

Sections 9 — 13

Sections 14 — 16 (not tide or submerged land)

Sections 17 — 18

Section 20;

Section 1

Sections 6 — 7

Section 12;

Section 3

Sections 4 — 6 (not tide or submerged land)

Sections 7 — 11

Sections 14 — 16

Sections 21 — 32;

Sections 15 — 18

Section 22

Sections 29 — 30

Section 31 (not tide or submerged land)

Section 32;

Sections 13 — 17

Sections 19 — 23

Sections 25 — 27

Sections 29 — 30

Sections 34 — 35

Section 36 (not tide or submerged land);

Section 1

Section 3

Section 4 (not tide or submerged land)

Section 9 (not tide or submerged land)

Sections 10 — 13

Sections 14 — 16 (not tide or submerged land)

Sections 21 — 23 (not tide or submerged land)

Sections 24 — 25

Sections 26 — 28 (not tide or submerged land);

Sections 1 — 4

Sections 7 — 9

Sections 10 — 11 (not tide or submerged land)

Sections 12 — 14

Sections 15 — 16 (not tide or submerged land)

Sections 17 — 18

Section 21 (not tide or submerged land)

Section 22

Sections 28 — 29

Sections 33 — 34;

Sections 1 — 2

Sections 4 — 5

Sections 7 — 12

Sections 13 — 18 (not tide or submerged land);

Sections 20 — 23

Sections 26 — 28;

Sections 26 — 27

Sections 31 — 34;

Sections 2 — 5

Sections 8 — 12

Sections 13 — 16 (not tide or submerged land)

Section 17.

History.

(§ 2 ch 140 SLA 1972)

Revisor’s notes. —

Formerly
AS 16.20.230(a)(1).
Renumbered in 1987.

Sec. 16.20.555.
Port Heiden Critical Habitat Area established.

The following described area is established as the Port Heiden Critical Habitat Area:

Township 38 South, Range 59 West, Seward Meridian

Township 38 South, Range 60 West, Seward Meridian Sections 17 — 19;

Township 38 South, Range 61 West, Seward Meridian

Township 39 South, Range 59 West, Seward Meridian

Township 39 South, Range 60 West, Seward Meridian

Township 39 South, Range 61 West, Seward Meridian

Township 39 South, Range 62 West, Seward Meridian

Sections 13 — 15 (not tide or submerged land)

Section 16

Section 21

Sections 22 — 27 (not tide or submerged land)

Section 28

Sections 33 — 34

Sections 35 — 36 (not tide or submerged land);

Sections 24 — 26

Section 34;

Sections 1 — 2 (not tide or submerged land)

Section 3

Sections 10 — 14 (not tide or submerged land)

Section 15

Sections 19 — 22

Sections 26 — 29

Sections 30 — 33 (not tide or submerged land)

Sections 34 — 36;

Sections 18 — 24

Section 25 (not tide or submerged land)

Sections 26 — 27

Sections 28 — 36 (not tide or submerged land);

Sections 2 — 4

Sections 8 — 9

Section 10 (not tide or submerged land)

Sections 11 — 13

Sections 14 — 15 (not tide or submerged land)

Sections 16 — 18

Sections 19 — 20 (not tide or submerged land)

Section 21

Sections 22 — 36 (not tide or submerged land);

Section 13

Sections 23 — 28

Sections 32 — 34

Sections 35 — 36 (not tide or submerged land).

History.

(§ 2 ch 140 SLA 1972)

Revisor’s notes. —

Formerly AS 16.20.230(a)(2).
Renumbered in 1987.

Sec. 16.20.560.
Cinder River Critical Habitat Area established.

The following described area is established as the Cinder River Critical Habitat Area:

Township 32 South, Range 54 West, Seward Meridian

Township 33 South, Range 55 West, Seward Meridian

Township 33 South, Range 56 West, Seward Meridian

Township 34 South, Range 56 West, Seward Meridian

Township 34 South, Range 57 West, Seward Meridian

Section 29

Sections 31 — 32;

Sections 1 — 4

Sections 7 — 13

Sections 14 — 17 (not tide or submerged land)

Section 18;

Sections 13 — 14

Sections 22 — 23

Sections 24 — 26 (not tide or submerged land)

Sections 27 — 29

Sections 31 — 32

Sections 33 — 36 (not tide or submerged land);

Sections 5 — 7

Section 4 N 1/2;

Section 1

Section 12.

History.

(§ 2 ch 140 SLA 1972)

Revisor’s notes. —

Formerly AS 16.20.230(a)(3).
Renumbered in 1987.

Sec. 16.20.565.
Egegik Critical Habitat Area established.

The following described area is established as the Egegik Critical Habitat Area:

Township 24 South, Range 51 West, Seward Meridian

Township 23 South, Range 51 West, Seward Meridian

Township 23 South, Range 50 West, Seward Meridian

Sections 1 — 2

Section 11 S 1/2

Section 12 N 1/2;

Section 13

Sections 24 — 25

Sections 35 — 36;

Section 7

Sections 18 — 19

Section 30

Section 31 (not tide or submerged land).

History.

(§ 2 ch 140 SLA 1972; am § 28 ch 35 SLA 2003)

Revisor’s notes. —

Formerly AS 16.20.230(a)(4).
Renumbered in 1987.

Sec. 16.20.570.
Pilot Point Critical Habitat Area established.

The following described area is established as the Pilot Point Critical Habitat Area:

Township 30 South, Range 52 West, Seward Meridian (protracted)

Township 30 South, Range 51 West, Seward Meridian (protracted)

Township 31 South, Range 51 West, Seward Meridian (protracted)

Township 30 South, Range 52 West, Seward Meridian (protracted)

Township 31 South, Range 52 West, Seward Meridian (protracted)

Township 30 South, Range 53 West, Seward Meridian (protracted)

Township 31 South, Range 53 West, Seward Meridian (protracted)

Township 32 South, Range 54 West, Seward Meridian (protracted)

Sections 1 — 3

Section 12;

Sections 5 — 8

Section 17;

Sections 5 — 8

Sections 13 — 15

Sections 17 — 27;

Sections 27 — 29

Sections 31 — 34;

Sections 1 — 3

Sections 5 — 6

Sections 11 — 14

Sections 23 — 24;

Section 36;

Sections 1 — 2

Sections 10 — 11

Sections 12 — 14 (not tide or submerged land)

Sections 15 — 16

Sections 20 — 21

Sections 22 — 28 (not tide or submerged land)

Sections 29 — 31

Sections 32 — 36 (not tide or submerged land);

Section 36.

History.

(§ 2 ch 140 SLA 1972)

Revisor’s notes. —

Formerly AS 16.20.230(a)(5).
Renumbered in 1987.

Sec. 16.20.575.
Kalgin Island Critical Habitat Area established.

The following described area is established as the Kalgin Island Critical Habitat Area:

Township 3 North, Range 15 West, Seward Meridian

Township 3 North, Range 16 West, Seward Meridian

Township 4 North, Range 16 West, Seward Meridian

Section 7 NW 1/4

Section 6 SW 1/4;

Section 1

Sections 11 — 12

Section 2 E 1/2;

Section 35 E 1/2

Section 36.

History.

(§ 2 ch 140 SLA 1972)

Revisor’s notes. —

Formerly AS 16.20.230(a)(6).
Renumbered in 1987.

Sec. 16.20.580.
Fox River Flats Critical Habitat Area established.

The following described area is established as the Fox River Flats Critical Habitat Area:

Township 4 South, Range 10 West, Seward Meridian

Township 4 South, Range 9 West, Seward Meridian

Section 20 SE 1/4 (not tide or submerged land)

Section 21 S 1/2 (not tide or submerged land)

Section 22 S 1/2

Section 23 S 1/2 (not tide or submerged land)

Sections 25 — 29

Sections 33 — 36;

Section 30 W 1/2 (not tide or submerged land).

History.

(§ 2 ch 140 SLA 1972)

Revisor’s notes. —

Formerly AS 16.20.230(a)(7).
Renumbered in 1987.

Administrative Code. —

For prohibited activities, see 5 AAC 95, art. 3.

For state critical habitat areas, see 5 AAC 95, art. 6.

Sec. 16.20.585.
Chilkat River Critical Habitat Area established.

The following described area is established as the Chilkat River Critical Habitat Area:

The areas encompassed by a boundary beginning at a point identical with the north corners common to Sections 1 and 2, Township 29 South, Range 56 East, Copper River Meridian, Alaska; thence west a distance of 500 feet along the north boundary of Section 2; thence south along a line parallel to the west boundary of Section 2, Township 29 South, Range 56 East, Copper River Meridian, a distance of approximately one mile to the south boundary of Section 2; thence east a distance of approximately 500 feet to the southeast corner of Section 2; thence south along the east boundary of Section 11, Township 29 South, Range 56 West, Copper River Meridian crossing the Tsirku River, to the first point of intersection with a meander line 500 feet upland from the line of mean high water on the south bank of the Tsirku River; thence easterly along said meander line to its first point of intersection with a western boundary or the northerly extension of the western boundary of U.S.
Survey 786; thence to the northwest corner of U.S.
Survey 786; thence east 2,640 feet to the northeast corner of U.S.
Survey 786; thence south along the east boundary to U.S.
Survey 786 to its intersection with the section line common to Sections 17 and 20 of Township 29 South, Range 57 East, Copper River Meridian; thence east along said section line to its first point of intersection with a meander line running 500 feet upland from the mean high water mark on the west bank of the Chilkat River; thence meandering in a southeasterly direction along a line 500 feet upland from the mean high water mark on the southeast bank of the Chilkat River to its first point of intersection with the section line common to Sections 21 and 28 of Township 29 South, Range 57 East, Copper River Meridian; thence east along said section line to the corner common to Sections 21, 22, 27 and 28, Township 29 South, Range 57 East, Copper River Meridian; thence north along section lines to the point of intersection with the Haines Highway right-of-way; thence northwesterly along the southwest boundary of said highway right-of-way to the point of intersection with the north boundary of Section 6, Township 29 South, Range 57 East, Copper River Meridian; thence west along section lines to the point of beginning, comprising 4,800 acres, more or less.

History.

(§ 2 ch 140 SLA 1972)

Revisor’s notes. —

Formerly AS 16.20.230(a)(8).
Renumbered in 1987.

Sec. 16.20.590.
Kachemak Bay Critical Habitat Area established.

The following described area is established as the Kachemak Bay Critical Habitat Area:

Township 4 South, Range 10 West, Seward Meridian (only tide and submerged land and waters);

Township 5 South, Range 10 West, Seward Meridian (only tide and submerged land and waters);

Township 5 South, Range 11 West, Seward Meridian (only tide and submerged land and waters);

Township 5 South, Range 12 West, Seward Meridian (only tide and submerged land and waters);

Township 6 South, Range 11 West, Seward Meridian (only tide and submerged land and waters);

Township 6 South, Range 12 West, Seward Meridian (only tide and submerged land and waters);

Township 6 South, Range 13 West, Seward Meridian (only tide and submerged land and waters);

Township 6 South, Range 14 West, Seward Meridian (only tide and submerged land and waters);

Township 7 South, Range 11 West, Seward Meridian (only tide and submerged land and waters);

Township 7 South, Range 12 West, Seward Meridian (only tide and submerged land and waters);

Township 7 South, Range 13 West, Seward Meridian (only tide and submerged land and waters);

Township 7 South, Range 14 West, Seward Meridian (only tide and submerged land and waters);

Township 8 South, Range 12 West, Seward Meridian (only tide and submerged land and waters);

Township 8 South, Range 13 West, Seward Meridian (only tide and submerged land and waters);

Township 8 South, Range 14 West, Seward Meridian (only tide and submerged land and waters);

Township 9 South, Range 14 West, Seward Meridian (only tide and submerged land and waters);

Township 9 South, Range 15 West, Seward Meridian (only tide and submerged land and waters east of a line from Anchor Point to Point Pogibshi);

Township 5 South, Range 15 West, Seward Meridian (including all tide and submerged land and waters east of a line from Anchor Point to Point Pogibshi);

Township 6 South, Range 15 West, Seward Meridian (including all tide and submerged land and waters east of a line from Anchor Point to Point Pogibshi);

Township 7 South, Range 15 West, Seward Meridian (including all tide and submerged land and waters east of a line from Anchor Point to Point Pogibshi);

Township 8 South, Range 15 West, Seward Meridian (including all tide and submerged land and waters east of a line from Anchor Point to Point Pogibshi);

Township 9 South, Range 12 West, Seward Meridian (only tide and submerged land and waters).

Notwithstanding (a) of this section, the land described in this subsection is excluded from the Kachemak Bay Critical Habitat Area established under (a) of this section. The land that is excluded is described as

Township 6 South, Range 13 West, Seward Meridian

Township 7 South, Range 13 West, Seward Meridian

Section 35 (those portions of the tidelands and submerged lands lying northerly of the Homer Spit, including any portion of the Homer Small Boat Basin, within the SE1/4 of the protracted section; and any portion within The Fishin’ Hole subdivision, Plat 92-39 Homer Recording District)

Section 36 (those portions of the tidelands and submerged lands, including any portion of the Homer Small Boat Basin within the S1/2 of the protracted section);

Section 1 (those portions of the tidelands and submerged lands lying northerly or easterly of the Homer Spit, including any portion of the Homer Small Boat Basin, within the N1/2N1/2 and N1/2S1/2N1/2 of the protracted section)

Section 2 (those portions of the tidelands and submerged lands lying in the Homer Small Boat Basin within the NE1/4NE1/4NE1/4 of the protracted section).

History.

(§ 2 ch 117 SLA 1974; am §§ 6, 7 ch 6 SLA 1993; am § 1 ch 3 SLA 2014)

Revisor’s notes. —

Formerly AS 16.20.230(a)(9).
Renumbered in 1987.

Administrative Code. —

For prohibited activities, see 5 AAC 95, art. 3.

For state critical habitat areas, see 5 AAC 95, art. 6.

Sec. 16.20.595.
Clam Gulch Critical Habitat Area established.

The following described area is established as the Clam Gulch Critical Habitat Area:

All tide and submerged land to the minus five foot elevation, from Cape Kasilof to Happy Valley, contained in the following description:

Township 3 North, Range 12 West, Seward Meridian Sections 9, 16, 21, 28, 33;

Township 2 North, Range 12 West, Seward Meridian Sections 4, 8, 9, 17, 20, 29, 31, 32;

Township 1 North, Range 12 West, Seward Meridian Sections 6 — 7;

Township 1 North, Range 13 West, Seward Meridian Sections 12 — 14, 22, 23, 27, 33, 34;

Township 1 South, Range 13 West, Seward Meridian Sections 5 — 7;

Township 1 South, Range 14 West, Seward Meridian Sections 12 — 14, 23, 26 — 27, 33 — 34;

Township 2 South, Range 14 West, Seward Meridian Sections 4, 8 — 9, 17, 20, 29, 32;

Township 3 South, Range 14 West, Seward Meridian Sections 5, 6, and that portion of Section 7 lying north of Happy Creek.

History.

(§ 1 ch 31 SLA 1976)

Revisor’s notes. —

Formerly AS 16.20.230(a)(10).
Renumbered in 1987.

Cross references. —

For rights of set net operators holding leases on March 31, 1976, see §§ 2 and 3, ch. 31, SLA 1976 in the Temporary and Special Acts.

Sec. 16.20.600.
Copper River Delta Critical Habitat Area established.

The following described area is established as the Copper River Delta Critical Habitat Area:

All public land, tideland, submerged land, and water contained in the following description:
Beginning at a point on the south edge of the Copper River Highway right-of-way 200´ west of its intersection with the Eyak Trail trailhead; thence southwesterly 200´ west of the Eyak Trail and parallel to it approximately 4 miles to the mean high tide line; thence southwesterly along the mean high tide line to Point Whitshed; thence northwesterly along the mean high tide line to a point of intersection at the west edge of Section 21, T16S, R4W, C.R.M. and the mean high tide line at the mouth of Orca Inlet; thence westerly a distance of approximately 3 miles to the northeast tip of Little Mummy Island; thence southwesterly a distance of approximately 4 miles to the intersection of the south edge of Section 33, T16S, R5W, C.R.M. and the mean high tide line; thence along the mean high tide line on the east portion of Hinchinbrook Island, including Boswell Bay to Point Bentinck; thence S.68°E. approximately 57 miles to a point of intersection with the protracted boundary line common between R4E and R5E, C.R.M.; thence N.13°E. approximately 10 miles to Palm Point; thence northwesterly along the mean high tide line to a point of intersection with the west boundary line of Section 25, T19S, R4E, C.R.M. to a point of intersection with the mean high tide line on the north shore of Softuk Bar; thence northwesterly to Windy Point; thence due east approximately 1.1 miles to the 200 foot contour; thence northerly along the 200 foot contour around Ragged Mountain, easterly and northerly along the eastern shore of Martin and Little Martin lakes to a point 4 miles due south of Bridge No. 227 on the Proposed Bering River Highway; thence north to Bridge No 227; thence westerly along the south edge of the Bering River Highway to its junction with the Copper River Highway; thence, westerly along the south edge of the Copper River Highway to the point of beginning; excluding all areas within the Cordova Airport Boundaries.

History.

(§ 1 ch 93 SLA 1978)

Revisor’s notes. —

Formerly AS 16.20.230(a)(11).
Renumbered in 1987.

Sec. 16.20.605.
Anchor River and Fritz Creek Critical Habitat Area established.

All state land and water contained in the following described areas is established as the Anchor River and Fritz Creek Critical Habitat Area:

Township 4 South, Range 13 West, Seward Meridian

Township 5 South, Range 12 West, Seward Meridian

Township 5 South, Range 13 West, Seward Meridian

Township 5 South, Range 14 West, Seward Meridian

Notwithstanding AS

16.20.500

and the establishment of the Anchor River and Fritz Creek Critical Habitat Area under (a) of this section,

the use of and appropriation of water rights from Fritz Creek for a municipal and community water source is protected within the Anchor River and Fritz Creek Critical Habitat Area;

the possibility of the construction of a dam and reservoir on Fritz Creek is reserved within the Anchor River and Fritz Creek Critical Habitat Area.

The use and enjoyment of valid existing rights and interests within the Anchor River and Fritz Creek Critical Habitat Area are protected. Future conveyances, including but not limited to rights-of-way, timber sales, municipal entitlements, grazing leases, and oil and gas leases, may occur.

A management plan for the Anchor River and Fritz Creek Critical Habitat Area shall be adopted and may be revised by the Department of Fish and Game in consultation with the Department of Natural Resources under AS 44.62 (Administrative Procedure Act). The management plan shall reflect the concurrence of the Kenai Peninsula Borough as it applies to land committed by the borough to the Anchor River and Fritz Creek Critical Habitat Area.

The department shall establish a citizens’ advisory committee to work with the department and advise on implementation and revisions of the management plan for the Anchor River and Fritz Creek Critical Habitat Area.

Appointments to the citizens’ advisory committee shall be recommended by the Kenai Peninsula Borough and the City of Homer and shall include representatives from

industry and commercial users;

hunters, trappers, fishermen, and recreational users; and

officials representing the Kenai Peninsula Borough and the City of Homer.

Section 25

Section 35

Section 36;

Sections 17
—
20;

Section 2

Section 3

Section 4 E1/2

Section 8 S1/2

Sections 9 — 11

Sections 13 — 20

Section 21 W1/2

Section 24;

Section 13

Section 20 NE1/4

Sections 21 — 24

Section 26 N1/2

Section 27 N1/2

Section 28 N1/2.

History.

(§§ 1, 2 ch 47 SLA 1985; am §§ 1, 2 ch 170 SLA 1990)

Revisor’s notes. —

Formerly AS 16.20.230(a)(12), (b), (c), and (d).
Renumbered in 1987.

Administrative Code. —

For state critical habitat areas, see 5 AAC 95, art. 6.

Editor’s notes. —

Section 3, ch. 170, SLA 1990 approves the management plan dated June 1989, for the Anchor River and Fritz Creek Critical Habitat Area.

Sec. 16.20.610.
Dude Creek Critical Habitat Area.

The purpose of the Dude Creek Critical Habitat Area is the protection and enhancement of the wet meadow habitat that is the key roosting area for migrating lesser sandhill cranes, for the protection of lesser sandhill cranes, and for the continued public use and enjoyment of the area.

The following described area is established as the Dude Creek Critical Habitat Area:

The Dude Creek Critical Habitat Area described in (b) of this section shall be managed under a management plan prepared and implemented by the department in consultation with the community of Gustavus and the Board of Game.

The department shall allow public uses, including fishing, hunting, trapping, mechanized and nonmechanized public access, grazing, firewood harvesting, wildlife viewing, hiking, and berry picking under the management plan adopted under (c) of this section to the extent that the activities are compatible with (a) of this section.

The legislature understands that a portion of the state land described in (b) of this section is mental health trust land of the state and the legislature intends that the land retain its status as mental health trust land, notwithstanding its inclusion in the Dude Creek Critical Habitat Area.

Township 40 South, Range 58 East, Copper River Meridian

Section 2: W1/2

Section 3

Sections 9 — 10

Section 11: W1/2NE1/4, W1/2

Section 14: Lot 3, NW1/4, N1/2SW1/4, SW1/4SW1/4

Section 15

Section 16: N1/2, SE1/4.

History.

(§ 1 ch 31 SLA 1988)

Legislative history reports. —

For legislative letter of intent on ch. 31, SLA 1988, see the Senate letter of intent on CSSB 362 (Res), 1988 Senate Journal 2691-2692.

Sec. 16.20.615.
Tugidak Island Critical Habitat Area.

The state land above the mean high tide line within the following described area is established as the Tugidak Island Critical Habitat Area:

Township 41 South, Ranges 33 — 34 West, Seward Meridian;

Township 42 South, Range 33 West, Seward Meridian

Township 42 South, Ranges 34 — 35 West, Seward Meridian;

Township 43 South, Ranges 34 — 35 West, Seward Meridian.

In addition to the area described in (a) of this section, the water and the land below the mean high tide line in the lagoon at the northeast end of Tugidak Island are included within the Tugidak Island Critical Habitat Area.

The Tugidak Island Critical Habitat Area described in (a) and (b) of this section shall be managed under a management plan prepared by the department.

The department shall permit existing cabins to remain, subsistence and recreational uses to continue, and commercial uses such as seal hunting and placer mining to continue, if appropriate under the management plan adopted under (c) of this section to the extent that the activities are compatible with the establishment of the Tugidak Island Critical Habitat Area.

The department shall permit entry within the Tugidak Island Critical Habitat Area for the exploration and development of oil and gas resources when compatible with the purposes for which the critical habitat area was established. An oil and gas lease of state land within the Tugidak Island Critical Habitat Area is valid and continues in full force according to its terms.

Sections 1 — 11

Sections 14 — 23

Sections 25 — 36;

History.

(§ 2 ch 116 SLA 1988)

Revisor’s notes. —

Enacted as AS

16.20.610

.
Renumbered in 1988.

Cross references. —

For statement of legislative purpose, see § 1, ch. 116, SLA 1988 in the Temporary and Special Acts.

Administrative Code. —

For state critical habitat areas, see 5 AAC 95, art. 6.

Sec. 16.20.620.
Willow Mountain Critical Habitat Area established.

The following described area is established as the Willow Mountain Critical Habitat Area:

Township 20 North, Range 2 West, Seward Meridian

Township 20 North, Range 3 West, Seward Meridian

Township 21 North, Range 2 West, Seward Meridian

Township 21 North, Range 3 West, Seward Meridian

Township 22 North, Range 2 West, Seward Meridian

Notwithstanding AS

16.20.510

—

16.20.530

, the commissioner of fish and game, in consultation with the commissioner of natural resources, shall prepare a management plan for the Willow Mountain Critical Habitat Area. The commissioner of fish and game and the commissioner of natural resources shall exercise their respective authorities over the area in a manner consistent with the management plan.

Section 7

Sections 18 — 19;

Sections 1 — 2

Sections 11 — 14

Sections 23 — 24;

Sections 4 — 7

Section 18: W1/2;

Section 1

Sections 11 — 14

Sections 23 — 26

Sections 35 — 36;

Sections 19 — 21

Sections 28 — 33.

History.

(§ 2 ch 28 SLA 1989)

Cross references. —

For statement of legislative purpose, see § 1, ch. 28, SLA 1989 in the Temporary and Special Acts.

Sec. 16.20.625.
Redoubt Bay Critical Habitat Area.

The state-owned land and water above mean lower low water contained in the following described parcels is designated as the Redoubt Bay Critical Habitat Area:

Township 6 North, Range 16 West, Seward Meridian

Township 6 North, Range 17 West, Seward Meridian

Township 7 North, Range 14 West, Seward Meridian

Township 7 North, Range 15 West, Seward Meridian

Township 7 North, Range 16 West, Seward Meridian;

Township 7 North, Range 17 West, Seward Meridian

Township 8 North, Range 15 West, Seward Meridian

Township 8 North, Range 16 West, Seward Meridian;

Township 8 North, Range 17 West, Seward Meridian

Township 8 North, Range 18 West, Seward Meridian

Township 9 North, Range 15 West, Seward Meridian

Township 9 North, Range 16 West, Seward Meridian

Township 9 North, Range 17 West, Seward Meridian

Notwithstanding AS

16.20.500

and the establishment of the Redoubt Bay Critical Habitat Area under (a) of this section, egress and ingress to and from private property within the Redoubt Bay Critical Habitat Area shall be permitted through access corridors established through agreement between the state and the private property owners involved.

The state may not acquire by eminent domain privately owned land within the Redoubt Bay Critical Habitat Area but may acquire privately owned land within the Redoubt Bay Critical Habitat Area by purchase, exchange, or otherwise for inclusion in the Redoubt Bay Critical Habitat Area.

The department shall permit entry within the Redoubt Bay Critical Habitat Area for the exploration and development of oil and gas resources when it is compatible with the purposes for which the critical habitat area is established. An oil and gas lease of state land and existing oil and gas pipeline rights-of-way within the critical habitat area are valid and continue in full force according to their terms. The commissioner shall permit inspection and maintenance activities necessary to ensure the integrity of oil and gas pipelines on existing leases and pipeline rights-of-way in a manner that is compatible with the purposes for which the Redoubt Bay Critical Habitat Area was established.

The department shall permit uses of the Redoubt Bay Critical Habitat Area in a manner that is compatible with the purposes for which the critical habitat area is established. The department shall permit the following public uses to continue without further approval by the department unless the department determines that the use is not compatible with the purposes for which the Redoubt Bay Critical Habitat Area is established:

hunting, including subsistence hunting, trapping, and subsistence, commercial, and sport fishing, including the continued use of cabins for the purpose of hunting, trapping, and fishing;

hiking, backpacking, and camping, including the use of campfires;

cross-country skiing, snowmachining, boating, and the landing of aircraft; and

other related uses that are temporary in duration and have no foreseeable adverse effects on vegetation, drainage, soil stability, or fish and game and their habitat.

The Kenai Peninsula Borough shall establish a citizens’ advisory committee to work with the department and the Department of Natural Resources and advise on the development of policies and regulations that affect the Redoubt Bay Critical Habitat Area.

Appointments to the citizens’ advisory committee shall be made by the Kenai Peninsula Borough and shall include representatives from

industry and commercial users including the oil and gas industry, timber, mining, and commercial fishing;

hunters, trappers, fishermen, cabin owners, and recreational users; and

officials representing the Kenai Peninsula Borough.

Sections 1 — 12: North of the south bank of Drift River

Sections 14 — 18: North of the south bank of Drift River

Sections 20 — 22: North of the south bank of Drift River;

Sections 1 — 6: North of the south bank of Drift River

Sections 10 — 12: North of the south bank of Drift River;

Section 5: S1/2

Sections 6 — 8

Section 18;

Sections 1 — 21

Sections 29 — 31;

Sections 1 — 4

Section 8: E1/2

Sections 9 — 17

Sections 19 — 27

Section 30

Sections 34 — 36;

Section 1: S1/2

Section 2: S1/2

Section 3: W1/2

Sections 4 — 11

Section 12: N1/2

Sections 13 — 36;

Sections 1 — 17

Sections 20 — 29

Sections 32 — 36;

Sections 1 — 12;

Sections 29 — 30;

Sections 19 — 36;

Sections 21 — 36.

History.

(§ 2 ch 111 SLA 1989)

Revisor’s notes. —

Enacted as AS

16.20.620

.
Renumbered in 1989.

Cross references. —

For legislative purpose in establishing the Redoubt Bay Critical Habitat Area, see § 1, ch. 111, SLA 1989 in the Temporary and Special Acts.

Administrative Code. —

For state critical habitat areas, see 5 AAC 95, art. 6.